Utah statutes.
53A-6-601.    Definition.

As used in this part "hearing" means a proceeding held in accordance with generally accepted principles of due process and administrative law in which definite issues of fact or of law are tried before a hearing body, and in which proceeding evidence is presented and witnesses heard, and in which the party against whom the proceedings are held has a right to:

(1)  appear with or without counsel to present evidence, confront and cross-examine witnesses, or subpoena witnesses; and

(2)  obtain a decision based solely upon evidence presented to the hearing body in the presence of both parties or representatives of both parties, recognizing that presence is satisfied if a party has been given a reasonable opportunity to attend, even if the party fails to do so.

